Virginia statutes. Title 51.1. Pensions, Benefits, and Retirement.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 51.1-1100.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Act”
means the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act (§

65.2-100

et seq.).

“Company”
means an insurance company issuing a long-term disability insurance policy purchased by the Board pursuant to this chapter.

“Disability”
means a partial disability or total disability.

“Disability benefit”
means income replacement payments payable to a participating employee under a short-term or long-term disability benefit program pursuant to this chapter. Disability benefits do not include benefits payable under the Act.

“Eligible employee”
means (i) a state employee as defined in §

51.1-124.3

who is a member of the retirement system, including the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

; (ii) an employee as defined in §

51.1-201

; (iii) an employee as defined in §

51.1-212

; or (iv) a qualifying part-time employee. Any person participating in a plan established pursuant to §

51.1-126

,

51.1-126.1

,

51.1-126.4

,

51.1-126

.5,

51.1-502.1

, or

51.1-502.3

shall not be an eligible employee. Employees of the University of Virginia Medical Center covered under the basic insurance policies purchased by the Medical Center shall not be considered eligible employees under this chapter, unless the University of Virginia Board of Visitors, or a duly authorized agent or representative of the Board of Visitors, purchases such insurance policies from the Virginia Retirement System.

“Existing employee”
means an employee who elected to participate in the Virginia Sickness and Disability Program.

“Partial disability”
exists during the first 24 months following the occurrence or commencement of an illness or injury when an employee is earning less than 80 percent of his predisability earnings and, as a result of an injury or illness, is (i) able to perform one or more, but not all, of the essential job functions of his own job on an active employment or a part-time basis; or (ii) able to perform all of the essential job functions of his own job only on a part-time basis.

“Participating employee”
means any eligible employee required or electing to participate in the program.

“Program”
means the program providing sick leave, family and personal leave, short-term disability, and long-term disability benefits for participating employees established pursuant to this chapter.

“Qualifying part-time employee”
means any person who would qualify as a state employee as defined in §

51.1-124.3

but, rather than being regularly employed full time on a salaried basis, is regularly employed part time for at least 20 hours but less than 40 hours per week on a salaried basis.

“State service”
means the employee’s total period of state service as an eligible employee, including all periods of classified full-time and classified part-time service and periods of leave without pay, but not including periods during which the employee did not meet the definition of an eligible employee.

“Total disability”
exists (i) during the first 24 months following the occurrence or commencement of an illness or injury if an employee is unable to perform all of his essential job functions or (ii) after 24 months following the occurrence or commencement of an illness or injury if an employee is unable to perform any job for which he is reasonably qualified based on his training or experience and earning less than 80 percent of his predisability earnings.

“Work-related injury”
means an injury, as such term is defined in §

65.2-101

, to a participating employee for which benefits are payable under the Act and the Commonwealth is the employer for purposes of the Act.

In addition to the definitions listed above, the definitions listed in §

51.1-124.3

shall apply to this chapter except as otherwise provided.

History.

1998, c. 774; 1999, c. 144; 2000, c. 889; 2001, c. 694; 2012, cc. 701, 823; 2013, c. 463; 2015, c. 660.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 701 and 823, cl. 2 provides: “That any person who, as of January 1, 2013, has an agreement for the purchase of prior service shall be allowed to complete the purchase of prior service at the rate provided under the existing agreement.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 4-6.01 n, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding the Department of Human Resource Management Policies and Procedures, payment to employees with five or more years of continuous service who either terminate or retire from service shall be paid in one sum for twenty-five percent of their sick leave balance, provided, however, that the total amount paid for sick leave shall not exceed $5,000 and the remaining seventy-five percent of their sick leave shall lapse. This provision shall not apply to employees who are covered by the Virginia Sickness and Disability Program as defined in §

51.1-1100

, Code of Virginia. Such employees shall not be paid for their sick leave balances. However, they will be paid, if eligible as described above, for any disability leave credits they have at separation or retirement or may convert disability credits to service credit under the Virginia Retirement System pursuant to §

51.1-1103

(F), Code of Virginia.”

The 1999 amendment

substituted “51.1-126.4,

51.1-126.5

” for “51.1-126.2” in the paragraph defining “Eligible employee,” and added the paragraph defining “State service.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 889, in the paragraph defining “Eligible employee,” inserted “(iii) an employee as defined in §

51.1-212

” and substituted “(iv)” for “(iii),” added the paragraph defining “Existing employee,” rewrote the paragraph defining “Partial disability,” and in the paragraph defining “Total disability,” inserted “all of” and substituted “essential job functions” for “normal job duties” and “eighty” for “twenty” and deleted “the main duties of” following “unable to perform.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 694, in the paragraph defining “Eligible employee,” deleted “51.1-502.2” following “51.1-502.1,” and added the last sentence.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 701 and 823 are identical, and inserted “including the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

” in the paragraph defining “Eligible employee,” and made minor punctuation and stylistic changes throughout the section.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 463, in the paragraph defining “Eligible employee,” added present clause (iv), redesignated former clause (iv) as clause (v) and made a related change.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 660 in the definition for “Eligible employee,” inserted “or” preceding “(iv)” and deleted “a judge as defined in §

51.1-301

appointed or elected to an original term commencing on or after January 1, 2014; or (v)” following “(iv).”

§ 51.1-1101.
Sickness and disability program; disability insurance policies.

The Board shall develop, implement, and administer a sick leave, short-term disability, and long-term disability benefits program in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. The Board is authorized to delegate or assign to any person any of the duties required to be performed by the Board pursuant to this chapter. The Board is authorized to purchase long-term disability insurance policies for participating employees. The policies shall be purchased from and carried with a disability insurance company which is authorized to do business in the Commonwealth. Each policy shall contain a provision stipulating the maximum expense and risk charges that are determined by the Board to be on a basis consistent with the general level of charges made by disability insurance companies under policies of long-term disability insurance issued to large employers. The Board may require that the policies have reinsurance with a disability insurance company incorporated or organized under the laws of and authorized to do business in the Commonwealth. This section is not intended to abrogate the final authority of the Director of the Department of Human Resource Management under subdivision A 14 of §

2.2-1201

to establish and interpret personnel policy and procedures, such as the sick leave policy.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, the Board may self-insure long-term disability benefits in accordance with the standards set forth in §

51.1-124.30

.

History.

1998, c. 774; 1999, c. 144; 2000, cc. 66, 657; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2020, c. 548.

The 1999 amendment

added the subsection A designator and substituted “subdivision 13 of § 2.1-114.5” for “§ 2.1-114.5 (13)” in the last sentence thereof, and added subsection B.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by c. 66 and 657 are identical, and substituted “Human Resource Management” for “Personnel and Training” in the last sentence of subsection A.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 6, are identical, and substituted “subdivision A 13” for “subdivision 13” in the last sentence of subsection A.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 548 substituted “subdivision A 14” for “subdivision A 13” in subsection A in the last sentence.

§ 51.1-1102.
Additional powers of the Board.

In addition to any other powers granted to the Board under this title, the Board shall have the powers to:

Establish policies and procedures to implement and administer the program and the provisions of this chapter;

Contract for the provision of comprehensive case management;

Take all other actions necessary for the implementation and administration of the program; and

Adopt rules and policies that bring the program into compliance with any applicable law or regulation of this Commonwealth or the United States.

History.

1998, c. 774.

§ 51.1-1103.
Participation in the program.

All prior elections to participate in the program shall be irrevocable.

Except for eligible employees who are employed by an institution of higher education in a faculty position performing teaching, research or administrative duties, all eligible employees commencing employment or who are reemployed on or after January 1, 1999, shall participate in the program. The effective date of participation in the program for such employees shall be their first day of employment.
B. 1. Except for eligible employees who are employed by an institution of higher education in a faculty position performing teaching, research or administrative duties, all eligible employees commencing employment or who are reemployed on or after January 1, 1999, shall participate in the program. The effective date of participation in the program for such employees shall be their first day of employment.

Except for such employees of an institution of higher education, all eligible employees not participating in the program prior to October 1, 2002, shall participate in the program effective January 10, 2003, unless such employee elects not to participate in the program as provided herein. An election not to participate shall be in writing, and on forms prescribed by the Retirement System, and shall be received by the Retirement System during the period commencing on October 1, 2002, but before January 1, 2003. An election not to participate in the program shall be irrevocable and such employee shall be ineligible to participate in the program for the period of his continued employment by the Commonwealth except that any such employee who elects to participate in the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

shall participate in the program.

Any eligible employee who is employed by an institution of higher education in a faculty position performing teaching, research or administrative duties may elect to participate in the program established under this chapter or under an existing program provided by the institution. Any eligible employee who is (i) employed by an institution of higher education in a faculty position performing teaching, research or administrative duties prior to October 1, 2002, and (ii) not participating in the program, shall participate in the program established under this chapter effective January 10, 2003, unless such employee elects not to participate in the manner provided in subdivision B 2. Any eligible employee of an institution of higher education in a faculty position performing teaching, research or administrative duties employed or reemployed on or after October 1, 2002, shall participate in the program unless such employee elects not to participate in the program, in writing and on such forms as prescribed by the Retirement System, within 60 days from the time of entry upon the performance of his duties. The effective date of participation in the program for such employee shall be the first day following the expiration of such 60-day period or January 10, 2003, whichever is later.Any eligible employee under this subsection shall participate in the sickness and disability program established by his institution of higher education until such time as the employee participates in the program established under this chapter. If the institution of higher education has not established its own sickness and disability program, such eligible employee shall participate in the program established under this chapter effective on his first day of employment.An election not to participate in the program established under this chapter shall be irrevocable and such employee shall be ineligible to participate in the program for the period of his continued employment by the Commonwealth.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, no participating employee commencing employment or reemployment on or after July 1, 2009, shall receive benefits under Article 3 of this Chapter (Nonwork Related Disability Benefits) until the participating employee completes one continuous year of active employment or reemployment.

The provisions of this subsection shall apply to any eligible employee who participates in the program under the provisions of subdivision B 2 or subsection C. Any eligible employee, including a person employed by an institution of higher education in a faculty position performing teaching, research or administrative duties, who (i) is a member of the Retirement System, and (ii) commenced employment or was reemployed prior to January 1, 1999, shall have his sick leave balances, as of the effective date of coverage in the program, converted to disability credits, as provided in subsection F.

Any eligible employee converting his sick leave balance as provided in subsection E shall receive one hour of disability credit for each hour of sick leave. Disability credits shall be used to continue periods for which the participating employee receives income replacement during periods of short-term and long-term disability at 100 percent of creditable compensation. Disability credits shall be reduced by one day for each day that the participating employee receives short-term or long-term disability benefits.

Upon retiring directly from state service and receiving an immediate annuity, the eligible employee’s unused disability credits shall be converted to service credit under the Retirement System at the rate of one month of service for each 173 hours of disability credits, rounded to the next highest month, unless the employee elects to be paid for the balance of such disability credits under the same terms and subject to the same conditions as are in effect for the payment of sick leave benefits in the employee’s agency on December 31, 1998. Upon leaving state service under any other circumstances, the employee shall be paid for the balance of such disability credits under the same terms and subject to the same conditions as are in effect for the payment of sick leave benefits in the employee’s agency on December 31, 1998, unless he elects to have such credits converted to service credit under the Retirement System at the rate of one month of service for each 173 hours of disability credits, rounded to the next highest month. Upon entry into long-term disability, the employee may be paid for the balance of such disability credits under the same terms and subject to the same conditions in effect for payment of sick leave benefits in the employee’s agency as of December 31, 1998.

Eligibility for participation in the program shall terminate upon the earliest to occur of an employee’s (i) termination of employment, (ii) death, or (iii) retirement from service. Eligibility for participation in the program shall be suspended during periods that an employee is placed on nonpay status, including leave without pay, if such nonpay status is due to suspension pending investigation or outcome of employment-related court or disciplinary action.

History.

1998, c. 774; 1999, c. 144; 2000, c. 889; 2002, cc. 663, 697; 2004, c. 186; 2010, c. 750; 2013, c. 463.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, c. 518 provides: “That any employee eligible to participate in the Virginia Sickness and Disability Program under the provisions of subsection C of §

51.1-1103

between the periods of January 1, 1999, and December 31, 1999, who moved directly from a nonfaculty position within the same institution, shall not be deemed an eligible employee, if the employee requests such in writing.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 4-6.01 n, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding the Department of Human Resource Management Policies and Procedures, payment to employees with five or more years of continuous service who either terminate or retire from service shall be paid in one sum for twenty-five percent of their sick leave balance, provided, however, that the total amount paid for sick leave shall not exceed $5,000 and the remaining seventy-five percent of their sick leave shall lapse. This provision shall not apply to employees who are covered by the Virginia Sickness and Disability Program as defined in §

51.1-1100

, Code of Virginia. Such employees shall not be paid for their sick leave balances. However, they will be paid, if eligible as described above, for any disability leave credits they have at separation or retirement or may convert disability credits to service credit under the Virginia Retirement System pursuant to §

51.1-1103

(F), Code of Virginia.”

The 1999 amendment,

in subsection B, inserted “or its designee” in the first sentence, and substituted “first day of the pay period following the delivery of notice of the election to the Board or its designee” for “thirtieth following the delivery of notice of the election to the Board” in the last sentence; in subdivisions D 1, D 2, and subsection E, substituted “effective date of coverage” for “end of the first pay period in calendar year 1999”; and substituted “one day for each day” for “one hour for each hour” in subsection F.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 889, in subsection F, substituted “payment” for “conversion” in the next-to-last sentence and added the last sentence.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 663 and 697 are identical, and rewrote this section.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 186 substituted “60” for “sixty“ in the second and last sentences of the first paragraph in subsection C; and inserted “suspension pending investigation or outcome of employment-related court or” in the last sentence of subsection G.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 750 inserted present subsection D, and redesignated former subsections D through G as present subsections E through H.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 463 added “except that any such employee who elects to participate in the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

shall participate in the program” at the end of subdivision B 2.